Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 21 IDAHO CREDIT UNION ACT
§ 26-2141A. Receiver — Duties — Powers.

A receiver appointed pursuant to section 26-2141, Idaho Code, shall do all of the following:

Take possession of the books, records, and assets of the credit union and collect all debts, dues, and claims belonging to the credit union;

Sue and defend, compromise, and settle all claims involving the credit union;

Sell all real and personal property of the credit union;

Exercise all fiduciary functions of the credit union as of the date of the commencement of the receivership;

Pay all administrative expenses of the receivership. The administrative expenses are a first charge on the assets of the credit union and the receiver shall pay those expenses before any final distribution or payment of dividends to creditors or members;

Except as provided in this subsection, pay ratably the debts of the credit union. The receiver may not pay any debt that does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in full, but the holder of that debt is not entitled to payment of interest on the debt;

After paying or providing for payment of all the administrative expenses and debts under subsections (e) and (f) of this section, pay ratably to the members of the credit union the balance of the net assets of the credit union in proportion to the number of shares held and owned by each;

Have all the powers of the directors, officers, and members of the credit union necessary to support an action taken on behalf of the credit union; and

Hold title to the credit union’s property, contracts, and rights of action, beginning on the date the credit union is ordered into receivership.

A receiver appointed pursuant to section 26-2141, Idaho Code, may do all of the following:

Borrow money as necessary or expedient to aid in the liquidation of the credit union and secure the borrowing by the pledge of a lien, security interest, or mortgage on the assets of the credit union;

Employ agents, legal counsel, accountants, appraisers, consultants, and other personnel the receiver considers necessary to assist in the performance of the receiver’s duties. With the prior approval of the district court, the receiver may employ personnel of the department of finance if the receiver considers the employment to be advantageous or desirable. The expense of employing personnel of the department of finance is an administrative expense of the liquidation that is payable to the department of finance;

If approved by the district court, dispose of records of a credit union that are obsolete and unnecessary to administer the receivership or retain records, as necessary, through the termination of the receivership or for any period following the receivership as the receiver may find necessary or appropriate. In such case, a receiver may preserve assets of a liquidated credit union and deposit them in an account to be used to maintain the records of a liquidated credit union after the closing of the receivership; and

Exercise other powers and duties ordered by the district court under the laws of this state applicable to the appointment of a receiver.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2141A, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 11, p. 625.

§ 26-2142. Voluntary and/or involuntary liquidation.

A credit union may elect to dissolve voluntarily and wind up its affairs in the following manner: The board shall adopt a resolution recommending that the credit union be dissolved voluntarily and directing that the question of dissolution be submitted to a regular or special meeting of the members. After the adoption of the resolution to voluntarily dissolve, no receipts shall be accepted nor withdrawals permitted from its share or deposit accounts, nor shall any loans be made nor any dividends declared nor paid pending final determination by its membership on the voluntary dissolution. At a meeting specially called to consider the matter, a majority of the entire membership may vote to dissolve the credit union, provided a copy was mailed to the members of the credit union at least ten (10) days prior thereto. Any member not present at such meeting may, within the next twenty (20) days, vote in favor of or may oppose dissolution by signing a statement in form approved by the department of finance and such vote shall have the force and effect as if cast at such meeting. The credit union shall thereupon immediately cease to do business except for the purposes of liquidation, and the president and secretary shall within five (5) days following such meeting notify the department of finance of intention to liquidate and shall include a list of the names of the directors and officers of the credit union together with their addresses.

If the department of finance, after issuing notice of suspension and providing opportunity for a hearing, rejects the credit union’s plan to continue operations, the department of finance may issue a notice of involuntary liquidation and appoint a liquidating agent. The credit union may request a stay of execution of such action by appealing to the appropriate court of the jurisdiction in which the credit union is located. Involuntary liquidation may not be ordered prior to following the suspension procedures outlined in this chapter.

The credit union shall continue in existence for the purpose of discharging its debts, collecting and distributing its assets, and doing all acts required in order to wind up its business and may sue and be sued for the purpose of enforcing such debts and obligations until its affairs are fully adjusted. The board or, in the case of involuntary dissolution, the liquidating agent shall apply and distribute the assets of the credit union or the proceeds from any disposition of the assets of the credit union in the following sequence:

Secured creditors, up to the value of their collateral;

Costs and expenses of liquidation, including a surety bond that shall be required;

Wages due the employees of the credit union;

Costs and expenses incurred by creditors in successfully opposing the release of the credit union from certain debts as allowed by the department of finance;

Taxes owed to the United States or any other governmental unit;

Debts owed to the United States;

General creditors; secured creditors, to the extent their claims exceed the value of their collateral; and owners of deposit accounts, to the extent such accounts are uninsured; and
(h) Members, to the extent of uninsured share accounts and the organization that insured the accounts of the credit union.

If the credit union shall not be completely liquidated and its assets discharged within three (3) years after the special meeting of the members, the director may take possession of the books, records, and assets and proceed to complete liquidation. If the director determines after one (1) year from the commencement of liquidation proceedings that the liquidation is not proceeding in a reasonable and expeditious manner under all of the circumstances, he may take possession of the books, records, and assets and appoint a liquidating agent who shall give a bond to complete the liquidation.

As soon as the board or the liquidating agent determines that all assets from which there is a reasonable expectancy of realization have been liquidated and distributed as set forth in this section, the director shall execute a certificate of dissolution. The credit union shall be subject to examination by and reporting to the department of finance to determine that all procedures have been observed as required by this chapter and shall pay such examination fees as are determined by the department of finance in accordance with its schedules.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2142, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1988, ch. 158, § 2, p. 285; am. 2020, ch. 214, § 12, p. 625.

§ 26-2143. Branch offices.

A credit union may under such regulations as the director may adopt establish branch offices at locations other than its main office if the maintenance of such branch offices shall be reasonably necessary to furnish services to its membership. The credit union must justify that ninety per cent (90%) of the cost of the branch and its operation will be derived from existing and potential membership in the proposed area. No additional branch offices shall be established to serve persons who are not entitled to membership as defined in the common bond provision of the existing field of membership.

Prior written approval of the director shall be necessary for the establishment of branch offices. He shall have the authority to issue notice and hold a hearing to determine if the establishment of the branch office is necessary and in the best interests of the credit union.

The applicant credit union will pay to the department of finance an investigation fee to cover the actual cost of investigation not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). These funds will be deposited into the finance administrative account pursuant to section 67-2702, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2143, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1984, ch. 47, § 6, p. 76.

§ 26-2144. Administration, rules and regulations.

The administration of the provisions of this chapter shall be under the general supervision and control of the director. The director may from time to time make, amend and rescind such rules, regulations and forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. No rule, regulation or form may be made unless the director finds that the action is necessary or appropriate for the public interest or for the protection of the credit union’s welfare consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2144, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2145. Authority to exercise federal powers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, but subject to the limitations provided for in this section, a credit union may engage in any activity in which it could engage, exercise any power it could exercise, or make any loan or investment which it could make if it were operating as a federal credit union, or a credit union chartered by another state.

Before engaging in any activity or exercising any power afforded under this section, a credit union shall first notify the director of its intent to do so. This notice shall be sent to the director by U.S. mail, postage prepaid, certified or registered, with return receipt requested. Should the director take no action on the request within twenty (20) days of delivery to the director, the right to engage in the action or power so requested shall be deemed granted.

Should the director deny the request, the affected credit union shall have the right to request a hearing before the director, which hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days of the date of the denial.

The director shall have the discretion to deny any request which is inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter.

No such approval shall operate to deny the director of any of his authority under this chapter and such permitted activity shall be subject to regulation by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2145, as added by 1984, ch. 95, § 2, p. 220; am. 1997, ch. 111, § 3, p. 269.

§ 26-2146. Investment in service corporation.

No limitation or prohibition otherwise imposed by any provision of the laws of the state of Idaho exclusively relating to credit unions shall prevent or prohibit any two (2) credit unions from investing not more than ten percent (10%) of the paid-in shares and deposits of members of each of them in a credit union service corporation.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2146, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2147. Credit unions jointly holding stock — Effect of withdrawal by one credit union.

If stock in a credit union service corporation has been held by two (2) credit unions, and one (1) of such credit unions ceases to utilize the services of the corporation and ceases to hold stock in it, and leaves the other as the sole stockholding credit union, the corporation may nevertheless continue to function as such and the other credit union may continue to hold stock in it.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2147, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2148. Duty of credit union service corporation not to discriminate — Burden of proof.

Whenever a credit union, referred to in this section as any “applying credit union” subject to examination by either the department of finance of the state of Idaho, or a federal supervisory agency, applies for a type of credit union services for itself from a credit union service corporation which supplies the same type of credit union services to another credit union, and the applying credit union is competitive with any credit union, referred to in this section as a “stockholding credit union” which holds stock in such corporation, the corporation must offer to supply such services by either:

Issuing stock to the applying credit union and furnishing credit union services to it on the same basis as to the other credit unions holding stock in the corporation, or

Furnishing credit union services to the applying credit union at rates no higher than necessary to fairly reflect the cost of such services, including the reasonable cost of the capital provided to the corporation by its stockholders, at the corporation’s option, unless comparable services at competitive overall cost are available to the applying credit union from another source, or unless the furnishing of the services sought by the applying credit union would be beyond the practical capacity of the corporation. In any action or proceeding to enforce the duty imposed by this section, or for damages for the breach thereof, the burden shall be upon the credit union service corporation to show such availability.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2148, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2149. Prohibited activities.

No credit union service corporation may engage in any revenue producing activity other than the performance of credit union services for credit unions and, to an extent not exceeding one half (½) of its total activity, the performance of similar services for persons or organizations other than credit unions.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2149, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2150. Customer-credit union communication terminal.

A credit union may make available for use by its customers one (1) or more electronic devices or machines through which the customer may communicate to the credit union a request to withdraw money either from his account or from a previously authorized line of credit, or an instruction to receive or transfer funds for the customer’s benefit. The device may receive or dispense cash in accordance with such a request or instruction, subject to verification on line or off line by the credit union. Any transactions initiated through such a device shall be subject to verification by the credit union either by direct wire transmission or otherwise. Such facilities may be unmanned or manned.

A person may perform as would a device so long as the person does not perform any functions not specifically authorized by this section.

These devices shall be designated as a customer-credit union communication terminal (CCUCT). A CCUCT at locations other than the main office or a branch office of the credit union does not constitute a branch. A credit union shall provide insurance protection under its bonding program for transactions involving such devices.

The establishment and use of CCUCT is subject to the following limitations:

Written notice must be given to the director’s office no less than thirty (30) days before any CCUCT is put into operation. Any credit union presently utilizing a CCUCT shall comply with the notice requirements within thirty (30) days. Such notice shall describe with regard to the communication system:

The functions of the CCUCT shall be limited to:

Arrangements may be made at the CCUCT for the placing or installation of a receptacle in which a customer may place packaged communication intended for the credit union.

The CCUCT shall be a communication service available only to customers of the credit union or other financial institutions which the board of directors of the credit union may approve.

The CCUCT shall not be advertised as a full service branch or as performing anything other than activities set out in subsection (a) (2) of this section.

To the extent consistent with the anti-trust laws, credit unions are required to share unmanned CUCCTs [CCUCTs] at a reasonable fee with one (1) or more other financial institutions if requested by the other financial institution.

the location;

a general description of the area where located and the manner of installation;

the manner of operation;

the kinds of functions which will be performed;

whether the CCUCT will be shared, and, if so, under what terms and with what other institutions and their location;

the manufacturer and, if owned, the purchase price or, if leased, a copy of the lease;

the distance from the nearest credit union office and from the nearest similar CCUCT of the reporting credit union; and

the distance from the nearest office and nearest CCUCT of another credit union, which will share the facility, and the name of such other credit union or credit unions.

The director may issue a cease and desist order upon a finding that a credit union utilizing a CCUCT is doing so in a manner not specifically authorized by this section.

This section shall be deemed to apply to federal credit unions operating customer-credit union communication terminals and for the purpose of this section a financial institution shall mean any state or federally chartered commercial bank, savings and loan association or credit union authorized by the department of finance or a comparable federal agency to do business in the state of Idaho.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2150, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2151. Custodial accounts.

A credit union is authorized to act as custodian or fiduciary for members of the credit union and may receive reasonable compensation for so acting under any written trust instrument or custodial agreement in connection with a tax-advantaged savings plan authorized under the Internal Revenue Code or chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, if the funds of such trust or funds subject to the custodial agreement are invested only in savings accounts or deposits in such credit union. All funds held in such fiduciary capacity by any such credit union may be commingled for appropriate purposes of investment, but individual records shall be kept by the fiduciary for each participant and shall show in proper detail all transactions engaged in under the authority of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2151, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 2020, ch. 214, § 13, p. 625.

§ 26-2152. Interstate credit unions — Approval — Permit — Fees — Supervision.

Provided that the membership limits as defined in section 26-2110, Idaho Code, are maintained:

A credit union chartered under this chapter may operate in another state unless prohibited by the law of the other state. Idaho is the home state for any credit union chartered under this chapter.

A credit union chartered under the laws of another state may operate in Idaho with the approval of the director on the terms and conditions provided in subsection (2) of this section. Idaho is the host state for any credit union chartered under the laws of any other state. The state which charters the credit union is the home state of the credit union.

The director may issue a permit to a credit union chartered in another state to operate in this state in a manner consistent with the Idaho credit union act, provided that the credit union applies for such permit on a form approved by the director and has approval from the regulator of credit unions in its home state to operate in Idaho. A credit union for which Idaho is a host state shall acknowledge that Idaho laws relating to consumer protection apply to transactions with residents in Idaho. The credit union for which Idaho is a host state shall maintain its books and records in Idaho or in such other place as the director may agree in writing. The director may, pursuant to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, suspend or revoke the permit of any credit union for which Idaho is the host state for any violation of the Idaho credit union act.

The director shall assess fees as provided in section 26-2136, Idaho Code, to be paid by a credit union for which Idaho is the host state on the basis of the assets of the credit union which are derived from its operations in Idaho. The director, in his discretion, may adjust such fees according to the level of participation of the department in the supervision of the credit union.

The director may enter into agreements with private share insurers and credit union regulators both with the federal government and in other states, to coordinate and facilitate regulation and supervision of interstate credit unions as permitted by section 26-2610, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2152, as added by 1997, ch. 111, § 4, p. 269.

§ 26-2153. Share and deposit insurance.

Not later than January 1, 1986, a state chartered credit union shall apply for and obtain insurance on shares and deposits as provided by the national credit union administration under title II of the federal credit union act (12 U.S.C. section 1781 et seq.), or alternatively, a form of comparable insurance approved by the director. This requirement does not apply to a credit union with debt and equity capital consisting primarily of funds from other credit unions.

A credit union which has been denied a commitment for such insurance shall within thirty (30) days after the denial, commence steps to either liquidate, or merge with an insured credit union, or apply in writing to the director for additional time to obtain an insurance commitment.

No credit union shall be granted a charter by the director unless such credit union has obtained insurance of its member share and deposit accounts.

Notwithstanding the above, a credit union whose members, after being fully informed on the subject, vote, by a simple majority of those members present at a meeting called for such purpose, to not obtain share insurance, shall not be required to obtain such insurance as condition precedent to doing business in this state.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding the above, a credit union whose members, after being fully informed on the subject, vote, by a simple majority of those members present at a meeting called for such purpose, to not obtain share insurance, shall not be required to obtain such insurance as condition precedent to doing business in this state.

In those credit unions in which the membership has voted to reject the need for share insurance, the rejection shall be placed before the membership for reconsideration at least biannually thereafter.

Should the membership of a credit union, in which the need for share insurance has been rejected, determine, as provided above, that the need for share insurance does exist, the credit union shall, within thirty (30) days following the date of the meeting held for the purpose of voting on the subject, make application for and obtain insurance as provided above.

Those credit unions whose members have voted to remain uninsured shall disclose to their members, on a regular and periodic basis, that their shares and deposits in that credit union are not protected by share insurance and the procedures required by this section.

The director may make available reports of condition and examination findings to the national credit union administration or to any qualified insuring organization and may accept any report of examination made on behalf of such agency or organizations. The director may appoint an official of the national credit union administration or of any qualified insuring organization as a liquidating agent of an insured credit union.

The director shall grant one or more extensions of time to obtain the insurance upon satisfactory evidence that the credit union has made or is making a substantial effort to achieve the conditions precedent to issuance of the insurance.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2153, as added by 1984, ch. 59, § 1, p. 107.

§ 26-2154. Credit unions eligible as depositories.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any state credit union or federal credit union located within this state may become a state depository by making application for that purpose to the state treasurer and may accept such funds as nonmember deposits.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2154, as added by 1986, ch. 74, § 1, p. 220.

§ 26-2155. Designation of depository — Reporting of reserves and undivided earnings.

The state treasurer shall designate credit unions qualified under this chapter as a state depository or depositories. Such designation shall be determined by competitive bidding or by other means generally accepted as standard business practice. In no case shall the deposit or deposits of state funds in the account of any public entity in any credit union exceed at any one time, the total of the reserves and undivided earnings of such credit union or the total sum covered by share and deposit insurance provided by either the national credit union share insurance fund or by a deposit guarantee corporation authorized to issue share and deposit insurance contracts in this state, whichever sum shall be less. In the event that any credit union has been designated as a depository under this chapter, such designation shall continue in force until revoked by the treasurer.

Every credit union designated as a state depository and holding any deposit of the funds of the state of Idaho under the provisions of this section shall, on or before beginning to hold such deposits, file with the state treasurer the affidavit of one (1) of its officers showing the amount of the reserves and undivided earnings of such credit union. Such affidavits shall be effective for the purposes of this section, to and including January 31 next following the date of their filing but no longer, and, on or before that date, if such credit union is to continue as a designated state depository under this section, a like affidavit shall be filed in like manner for the succeeding year. No such credit union shall receive deposits from nor act as depository for the funds of the state of Idaho unless and until an affidavit as is herein required and which still continues in effect is on file with the state treasurer in accordance with this section.

The state treasurer is authorized in his or her discretion and from time to time to negotiate for the payment to designated state depositories of reasonable compensation for services rendered in acting as such depositors. The method and/or rate of such compensation and the terms and conditions thereof shall be fixed by the state treasurer after such negotiation, which may include the calling of bids for specific services. All bids received, whether by a formal bidding process or by negotiation, and the compensation fixed by the treasurer, which shall be in the form of a written agreement, shall be a matter of public record.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2155, as added by 1986, ch. 74, § 2, p. 220; am. 1988, ch. 158, § 3, p. 285.

§ 26-2156. Bond coverage.

Each credit union must be adequately insured against risk. The board of directors of each credit union must at least annually review its bond and other insurance coverage to ensure that it is adequate in relation to the potential risks facing the credit union and the minimum requirements set by the board.

Each credit union must purchase a blanket fidelity bond that:

Covers the officers, employees, directors, members of official committees, attorneys and other agents;

Covers against loss caused by fraud and dishonesty; and

Has the following required minimum dollar amount of coverage:

The maximum amount of allowable deductible is computed based on the credit union’s asset size and capital level, as follows:

The director may require an additional amount of bond coverage for a credit union, taking into account the size of the credit union, the credit union’s field of membership, risk level of the credit union, and any other factors the director finds relevant to the determination of appropriate bond coverage for a credit union.

The board of directors should purchase additional or enhanced coverage when circumstances warrant.

If a credit union fails to maintain a blanket fidelity bond in the amount prescribed by the director, the director may order the credit union to cease its operations until such time when the credit union obtains the required bond.

When a credit union receives notice that its fidelity bond coverage will be suspended or terminated, the credit union shall notify the director in writing no fewer than thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the suspension or termination.
History.

Assets Minimum Bond

$0 to $4,000,000 Lesser of total assets or $250,000

$4,000,001 to $50,000,000 $100,000 plus $50,000 for each million or fraction thereof over $1,000,000

$50,000,001 to $500,000,000 $2,550,000 plus $10,000 for each million or fraction thereof over $50,000,000, to a maximum of $5,000,000

Over $500,000,000 1% of assets rounded to the nearest hundred million, to a maximum of $9,000,000

Assets Maximum Deductible

$0 to $100,000 No deductible allowed

$100,001 to $250,000 $1,000

$250,001 to $1,000,000 $2,000

Over $1,000,000 $2,000 plus .001 of total assets, to a maximum of $200,000; for credit unions that received a composite capital, asset, management, earnings, liquidity, and sensitivity (CAMELS) rating of “1” or “2” for the last two (2) full examinations and maintained a net worth classification of “well-capitalized” under national credit union administration (NCUA) regulations part 702 for six (6) immediately preceding quarters or, if subject to a risk-based net worth (RBNW) requirement under NCUA regulations part 702, has remained “well-capitalized” for the six (6) immediately preceding quarters after applying the applicable RBNW requirements, the maximum deductible is $1,000,000

I.C.,§ 26-2156, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 21, p. 328; am. 2019, ch. 188, § 4, p. 596.

§ 26-2157. Authority of director to call and attend special meeting of the board.

The director may require and attend a special meeting of the board of a credit union if an examination of the credit union results in a composite capital adequacy, asset quality, management, earnings, liquidity, and sensitivity to market risk (CAMELS) rating of “3,” “4,” or “5.” The director’s request for a special board meeting must be made in writing to the chairman and the secretary of the board. On receipt of such a request, the secretary shall designate a time and place for the special board meeting, which shall be held within thirty (30) days after receipt of the request. The director may require the attendance of all of the directors at the special board meeting, and an absence unexcused by the director constitutes a violation of this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2157, as added by 2020, ch. 214, § 14, p. 625.

§ 26-2158 — 26-2167. Books and records — Examinations — False reports — Taxation — Conversion — Cease and desist order — Suspension — Liquidation — Branch offices — Administration, rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

§ 26-2168, 26-2169. [Reserved.]

CORPORATE CREDIT UNIONS

§ 26-2170. Definition, purpose and restrictions, Idaho corporate credit union.

The Idaho corporate credit union is a cooperative nonprofit corporate entity which can assist credit unions in meeting their investment and borrowing needs, assist credit unions in the sound management of their liquid assets and serve as a financial intermediary for credit unions.

Any person, corporation, copartnership or association, except a corporate credit union organized under the provisions of this chapter, or the Federal Credit Union Act, using a name or title containing the words “corporate credit union” or any derivation thereof or representing themselves as a corporate credit union shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned not more than one (1) year or both and may be permanently enjoined from using such words in its name.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2170, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2171. Organization — Idaho corporate credit union.

Any seven (7) or more credit unions within the state of Idaho, with at least one (1) credit union from each of the seven (7) chapters of the Idaho credit union league, may, through designated delegates appointed by their board of directors, organize the Idaho corporate credit union and become members thereof by:

Filing an application furnished by the director;

Executing in duplicate, articles of incorporation by the terms of which they agree to be bound, which articles shall state:

The name, which shall include the words “Idaho Corporate Credit Union” and the city in which the proposed credit union is to have its principal place of business;

The term of existence of the credit union, which shall be perpetual;

The par value of shares of the Idaho corporate credit union, which shall be one hundred dollars ($100);

The names and addresses of the respective credit unions who are subscribers to the articles of incorporation and the number of shares subscribed by each; and

Adopting bylaws for the general government of the credit union, consistent with provisions of this act and executing the same in duplicate.

Forwarding the required charter fee, application, articles of incorporation and the bylaws to the director. If they conform to the statute, as determined by the director, he shall issue a certificate of approval to the articles and return a copy of the bylaws and the articles to the applicants or their representative, which shall be preserved in the permanent files of the credit union.

The subscribers for the Idaho corporate credit union shall not transact any business until formal approval of the charter has been received. The director shall cause to be prepared a form of articles of incorporation and a form of bylaws consistent with this act which shall be used by the Idaho corporate credit union incorporators for their guidance.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2171, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2172. Amendments — Idaho corporate credit union.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may be amended as provided in the bylaws and in accordance with section 26-2106, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2172, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2173. Corporate powers — Idaho corporate credit union.

The Idaho corporate credit union shall have the general rights and powers of any other credit union organized under the Idaho Credit Union Act and shall have the following additional powers:

As authorized by its board of directors or executive committee, to deposit in federally insured state and national banks and deposit with or invest in shares of or loans to United States central credit union to an extent which shall not exceed its shares, and certificates of deposit.

Receive investments from members in the form of shares or corporate deposits. Time deposits of surplus funds shall be evidenced by certificates of deposit having a maturity of not less than ninety (90) days. Surplus funds are those funds which are not needed to meet the member’s loan needs or expenses.

To pay and return on shares, share certificates and deposits at such rates as are determined by the board of directors, giving due consideration to the amount and time period of the savings or investment commitment.

To borrow from any source except individuals provided that the total amount shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of its members’ shares, daily interest deposits and certificates of deposit. Provided that with prior written approval of the director of finance, the corporate credit union may exceed the fifty percent (50%) limitation.

To make loans and to participate with the United States central credit union in making loans to members of the corporate credit union upon the terms and conditions determined by the board of directors.

To make deposits in any member credit union in this state and the United States central credit union.

To purchase the fixed assets of a member credit union if the board of directors of the corporate credit union determines it in the best interest of the member credit union.

To develop and enter into agreement for the purpose of participation in any governmental agency liquidity or interlending system among credit unions and for the purpose of aiding credit unions in establishing concentrated lines of credit with other financial institutions, and to act as a depositor and transmitter of funds for the purpose of carrying out this power.

To accept deposits from the United States central credit union in the form of certificates of deposit.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2173, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2174. Membership in the Idaho corporate credit union.

Membership in the Idaho corporate credit union shall be limited to and consist of the credit union subscribers to the articles of incorporation, credit unions organized under the Idaho credit union act or the federal credit union act, and organizations or associations of credit unions who have paid the membership fee, if any, as provided in the bylaws, have subscribed to and paid for one (1) or more shares as provided in the bylaws and have complied with such other requirements as the articles of incorporation or the bylaws may specify.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2174, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2175. Expulsion and/or withdrawal from the field of membership of the Idaho corporate credit union.

A member of the Idaho corporate credit union may be expelled by the board of directors, but only after an opportunity has been given to the member to be heard for the purpose of such expulsion. A written notice of this hearing, setting forth the time, place, and date for such meeting shall be forwarded to the member by the board, together with the charges which serve as the basis for the expulsion. The member may be expelled for failure to meet the conditions of its membership, failure to carry out its obligation to the credit union, or refusal to comply with the provisions of the law or bylaws under which the corporate credit union operates or habitual neglect to pay obligations. Upon completion of the hearing, and if the board of directors has voted to expel the member, the member shall remain liable for any sums owed to the Idaho corporate credit union for loans and/or other purposes. The Idaho corporate credit union may require twenty (20) days’ written notice to withdraw shares and/or deposits by the member, as funds become available.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2175, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2176. Meetings and elections of the Idaho corporate credit union.

Meetings and elections shall be held as indicated in the bylaws. Each member shall have one (1) vote irrespective of shareholdings. No member may vote by proxy, but may vote through a duly authorized delegate appointed by the members of the board of directors or executive committee of each corporate member.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2176, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.